nl: Vergrendelingsmechanisme: Automatisch sluiten; Dubbele vergrendeling; Magnetisch; Bediening met één hand; Drukknop; Schuif; Schuivend; Draai; Andere
hr-HR: Mehanizam zaključavanja: Automatsko zatvaranje; Dvostruko zaključavanje; Magnetno; Rad jednom rukom; Gumb; Klizanje; Klizni; Zavijanje; Ostalo
da: Låsemekanisme: Automatisk lukning; Dobbeltlåsning; Magnetisk; Enhåndsbetjening; Trykknap; Skyde; Skyder; Dreje; Andet
el: Μηχανισμός κλειδώματος: Αυτόματο κλείσιμο; Διπλό κλείδωμα; Μαγνητικό; Λειτουργία με το ένα χέρι; Πιεστικό πλήκτρο; Ολίσθηση; Συρόμενη; Συστροφή; Άλλο
en: Locking mechanism: Auto-close; Double-locking; Magnetic; One-handed operation; Push-button; Slide; Sliding; Twist; Other
sl-SI: Zaklepni mehanizem: Samodejno zapiranje; Dvojno zaklepanje; Magnetno; Upravljanje z eno roko; Pritisni gumb; Drsni; Drsni; Zasuk; Drugo
hu: Záró mechanizmus: Automatikus zárás; Kettős zár; Mágneses; Egykezes működés; Nyomógomb; Csúszó; Toló; Elfordítható; Egyéb
nb: Låsemekanisme: Automatisk lukking; Dobbellås; Magnetisk; Enhåndsoperasjon; Trykknapp; Lysbilde; Glidende; Vri; Annet
lt-LT: Užrakto mechanizmas: Automatinis uždarymas; Dvigubas užraktas; Magnetinis; Valdymas viena ranka; Paspaudžiamas mygtukas; Slankioji spyna; Slankiojančios; Pasukama; Kita
zh-CN: 锁定机制: 自动关闭; 双重锁; 磁力; 单手操作; 按钮; 凉拖鞋; 单移门; 扭转; 其他
ru: Запирающий механизм: Автоматическое закрытие; Двойная блокировка; Магнитный; Управление одной рукой; Кнопочный; Задвижка; Задвижной; Поворотный; Другое
th: กลไกการล็อค: ปิดอัตโนมัติ; ระบบตัวล็อกบานคู่; แม่เหล็ก; การทำงานด้วยมือเดียว; ปุ่มกด; Slide; แบบเลื่อน; บิด; อื่นๆ
de: Verriegelung: Automatisch schließen; Doppelverriegelung; Magnetisch; Einhandbedienung; Druckknopf; Slide; Schiebetür; Twistlock; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 鎖定裝置: 自動關閉; 雙鎖; 磁性; 單手操作; 按鈕開關; 滑動; 滑動式; 旋轉式; 其他
fr: Mécanisme de verrouillage: Fermeture automatique; Double verrouillage; Magnétique; Opération à une main; Bouton Push; À enfiler; Coulissant; Twist; Autre
ja: ロック機構: オートクローズ; ダブルロック; 磁気; 片手操作; プッシュボタン; スライド; スライド式; ツイスト; その他
vi: Cơ chế khoá: Tự động đóng; Khóa đôi; Từ tính; Thao tác bằng một tay; Nút ấn; Dép slide; Trượt; Xoắn; Khác
cs: Mechanizmus zámku: Automatické zavírání; Dvojité zamykání; Magnetická; Ovládání jednou rukou; Tlačítko; Zasunovací; Zásuvné; Otočný; Jiné
ko: 잠금 메커니즘: 자동 종료; 이중 잠금; 자기식; 한 손 작동; 푸시 버튼; 슬라이드; 슬라이딩; 트위스트; 기타
ro-RO: Mecanism de blocare: Închidere automată; Închidere dublă; Magnetic; Operare cu o singură mână; Buton; Glisor; Glisant; Răsucire; Altele
it: Meccanismo di blocco: Chiusura automatica; A doppia serratura; Magnetico; Azionamento con una sola mano; Pulsante; A scorrimento; Scorrevole; A torsione; Altro
fi: Lukitusmekanismi: Automaattinen sulkeminen; Kaksoislukitus; Magneettinen; Käyttö yhdellä kädellä; Painike; Liuku; Liukuva; Kierre; Muu
pt-PT: Mecanismo de bloqueio: Fechamento automático; Tranca dupla; Magnético; Operação com uma mão; Tecla de pressão; Deslize; Deslizante; Torção; Outro
pl: Mechanizm blokujący: Automatyczne zamykanie; Podwójne ryglowanie; Magnetyczny; Obsługa jednoręczna; Przycisk; Łatwe do wsuwania; Drzwi przesuwne; Nakrętka; Inne
tr: Kilitleme Mekanizması: Otomatik kapanış; Çift kilitleme; Manyetik; Tek elle çalıştırma; Düğme; Slayt; Sürgülü; Dönme; Diğer
pt-BR: Mecanismos de bloqueio: Fechamento automático; Travamento duplo; Magnética; Operação com uma mão; Botão-pressão; Slide; Deslizante; Torção; Outro
bg-BG: Заключващ механизъм: Автоматично затваряне; Двойно заключване; Магнитен; Работа с една ръка; Бутон за натискане; Плъзгач; Плъзгащ се; Twist; Други
es: Mecanismo de cierre: Cierre automático; Doble cerrojo; Magnético; Manejo con una sola mano; Pulsador; Chancla; Corredera; Girar; Otros
sv: Låsmekanism: Autostängning; Dubbellåsning; Magnetisk; Enhandsoperation; Tryckknapp; Skjutlås; Glidande; Vridande; Övrigt
sk-SK: Zamykací mechanizmus: Automatické zatváranie; Dvojité zamykanie; Magnetický; Ovládanie jednou rukou; Tlačidlo; Posúvací; Posuvný; Otočný; Iné